District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

3-324

Authorization of Board to carry out purposes of subchapter.

Repealed.

History

Sept. 7, 1957, 71 Stat. 620, Pub. L. 85-300, § 5
July 28, 1958, 72 Stat. 421, 422, Pub. L. 85-561, § 1(9)-(11)
Sept. 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 702, Pub. L. 86-378, § 1(4), (5)
Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-101, § 2, 33 DCR 793
Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-204, § 4, 36 DCR 454
Aug. 23, 1994, D.C. Law 10-152, § 21(a)(2), 41 DCR 4636

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-324.
1973 Ed., § 2-1723.

Transfer of Functions

See note to § 3-321.

Editor's Notes

Effect of dissolution of Sports Commission: See note to § 3-321.

Construction of Law 10-152: See note to § 3-321.